New York, session 2025-2026, A1525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 501 to read as follows: 3 § 501. Retail food store, food service establishment and food ware- 4 house grading system. 1. The commissioner shall establish a system for 5 grading inspection results for retail food stores, food service estab- 6 lishments and food warehouses, as defined in section five hundred of 7 this article. Such system shall use and post letters A, B or C to iden- 8 tify and represent such grading and classification with all other lower 9 grades being deemed to be failing grades. In establishing such system of 10 grading, the commissioner shall take into account the provisions of 11 title eight of article thirteen of the public health law and the 12 provisions of the sanitary code to establish a grading system that 13 reflects the safety and sanitation of the premises and food handling 14 practices to ensure compliance with state and local laws. 15 2. Such retail food stores, food service establishments and food ware- 16 houses shall conspicuously post near the entrance to such establishment 17 the letter grade identifying and representing the result of such estab- 18 lishment's most recently graded inspection by the department. Such post- 19 ing shall be done in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated 20 by the commissioner. In addition to a letter grade, such establishment 21 shall receive the findings upon which such grade is based. The retail 22 food store, food service establishment or food warehouse may appeal such 23 subsequent assignment of a letter grade designation to the commissioner 24 for review within thirty days of such assignment. While any such appeal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04441-01-5 A. 1525 2 1 is pending, the retail food store, food service establishment or food 2 warehouse shall post the letter grade that is being appealed. 3 3. The suggested interval between regularly scheduled inspections of 4 retail food stores, food service establishments and food warehouses may 5 be as follows: 6 (a) for establishments with a grade of "A", at least once every year; 7 and 8 (b) for establishments with a grade of "B", at least once every nine 9 months. 10 4. A retail food store, food service establishment or food warehouse 11 that requests a reinspection from the department, shall pay the depart- 12 ment a fee of up to two hundred fifty dollars. Provided however that the 13 provisions of this subdivision shall not negate the ability of any 14 department to inspect a retail food store, food service establishment or 15 food warehouse on the basis of a complaint from a member of the public. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect two years after it shall have become a 17 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 18 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 19 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 20 such effective date.